Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1307
Venue; receiver of stolen property.

Whenever any person shall be liable to prosecution as the receiver of any personal property that shall have been feloniously stolen, taken or embezzled, he may be indicted in any county where he received or had such property, notwithstanding the theft was committed in another county.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 423, p. 819;

R.S.1913, § 9030;

C.S.1922, § 10054;

C.S.1929, § 29-1307;

R.S.1943, § 29-1307.

If person has stolen property in the county, proof of act of receiving is not necessary to establish proper venue. State v. McKee, 183 Neb. 754, 163 N.W.2d 434 (1969).

This section does not authorize prosecution for burglary in another county than where the crime was committed. State v. Furstenau, 167 Neb. 439, 93 N.W.2d 384 (1958).